Alaska, session 34, HB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 21.36 is amended by adding a new section to article 5 to read: 05 Sec. 21.36.525. Decisions based on elected official status. (a) A person 06 transacting insurance in this state may not, solely because of a person's status as an 07 elected official, 08 (1) refuse to issue or renew insurance coverage; 09 (2) limit the scope of insurance coverage; 10 (3) cancel an existing policy of insurance; 11 (4) deny a covered claim; or 12 (5) increase the premium, policy fees, or rates charged on an insurance 13 policy. 14 (b) The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply if the refusal, limitation, 01 cancellation, denial, or increase is 02 (1) based on sound underwriting or actuarial principles reasonably 03 related to actual or anticipated loss experience; or 04 (2) required or authorized by law or regulation. 05 (c) In this section, "elected official" means a member of the legislature, the 06 governor, the lieutenant governor, a member of the state's congressional delegation, a 07 constitutional convention delegate, a borough or city mayor, or a member of a borough 08 or city assembly, council, or school board. 09 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 10 read: 11 APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to an insurance policy or contract issued, 12 delivered, or renewed on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.